Utah statutes.
31A-8-204.   Articles and bylaws.
(1)  The articles of a nonprofit organization shall conform to Subsections
16-6a-202(1)(a) through (e).  The articles of other organizations shall
conform to Section 16-10a-202.  In addition:
(a)  the powers of the corporation shall be limited to those permitted under
Section 31A-8-105;
(b)  the articles shall state whether the organization is a health maintenance
organization or a limited health plan;
(c)  the articles shall state the services to be provided or for which
indemnity is to be paid, which services provided and indemnity guaranteed
shall be consistent with the organization's designation under Subsection
(1)(b);
(d)  the articles shall state that as to health care services for which
individual providers are required to be licensed, the services provided by the
organization shall be provided by persons properly licensed to perform the
services;
(e)  the articles shall state whether providers of services are subject to
assessment or withholding to pay operating costs or financial deficits;
(f)  the articles shall state, for organizations having members, how persons
become members and that only members vote; and
(g)  the articles of an organization not having members shall state how the
directors of the organization shall be selected and removed.
(2)  The articles or bylaws shall designate three or more officers as the
principal officers of the corporation.  The principal offices shall be held by
at least three separate natural persons.
(3)  Section 31A-5-219 applies to amendments to articles of organizations.
(4)  Organizations shall adopt and maintain bylaws.  Section 16-6a-206 applies
to organizations, except for the statement that bylaws need not be adopted.
